New York, session 2025-2026, A5632.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The subdivision heading and paragraphs a and b of subdivi- 2 sion 10 of section 3602 of the education law, the subdivision heading 3 and paragraph a as amended by section 32 of part H of chapter 83 of the 4 laws of 2002, paragraph b as amended and such subdivision as renumbered 5 by section 16 of part B of chapter 57 of the laws of 2007, are amended 6 to read as follows: 7 Special services aid for large city school districts and other school 8 districts which were not components of a board of cooperative educa- 9 tional services in the base year and any school district located in a 10 city with a population between sixty-two thousand and sixty-five thou- 11 sand or between sixty-seven thousand and seventy thousand as recorded in 12 the two thousand ten census. a. The city school districts of those 13 cities having populations in excess of one hundred twenty-five thousand 14 and any other school district which was not a component of a board of 15 cooperative educational services in the base year shall be entitled to 16 an apportionment under the provisions of this section. Any school 17 district located in a city with a population between sixty-two thousand 18 and sixty-five thousand or between sixty-seven thousand and seventy 19 thousand as recorded in the two thousand ten census shall be entitled to 20 an apportionment under the provisions of paragraph b of this subdivi- 21 sion. 22 b. Aid for career education. There shall be apportioned to such city 23 school districts and other school districts which were not components of 24 a board of cooperative educational services in the base year and any 25 school district located in a city with a population between sixty-two EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09253-01-5 A. 5632 2 1 thousand and sixty-five thousand or between sixty-seven thousand and 2 seventy thousand as recorded in the two thousand ten census for pupils 3 in grades ten through twelve in attendance in career education programs 4 as such programs are defined by the commissioner, subject for the 5 purposes of this paragraph to the approval of the director of the budg- 6 et, an amount for each such pupil to be computed by multiplying the 7 career education aid ratio by three thousand nine hundred dollars. Such 8 aid will be payable for weighted pupils attending career education 9 programs operated by the school district and, for city school districts 10 of those cities having populations in excess of one hundred twenty-five 11 thousand and any other school district which was not a component of a 12 board of cooperative educational services in the base year for weighted 13 pupils for whom such school district contracts with boards of cooper- 14 ative educational services to attend career education programs operated 15 by a board of cooperative educational services. Weighted pupils for the 16 purposes of this paragraph shall mean the sum of the attendance of 17 students in grades ten through twelve in career education sequences in 18 trade, industrial, technical, agricultural or health programs plus the 19 product of sixteen hundredths multiplied by the attendance of students 20 in grades ten through twelve in career education sequences in business 21 and marketing as defined by the commissioner in regulations. The career 22 education aid ratio shall be computed by subtracting from one the prod- 23 uct obtained by multiplying fifty-nine percent by the combined wealth 24 ratio. This aid ratio shall be expressed as a decimal carried to three 25 places without rounding, but not less than thirty-six percent. 26 Any school district that receives aid pursuant to this paragraph shall 27 be required to use such amount to support career education programs in 28 the current year. 29 A board of education which spends less than its local funds as defined 30 by regulations of the commissioner for career education in the base year 31 during the current year shall have its apportionment under this subdivi- 32 sion reduced in an amount equal to such deficiency in the current or a 33 succeeding school year, provided however that the commissioner may waive 34 such reduction upon determination that overall expenditures per pupil in 35 support of career education programs were continued at a level equal to 36 or greater than the level of such overall expenditures per pupil in the 37 preceding school year. 38 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to the 39 calculation of aid for career education payable in the 2025--2026 school 40 year and years thereafter.